Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1708
Agency official, defined.

Agency official shall mean any elected or appointed officeholder, employee, consultant, person in the category of other personal service, or any other person receiving compensation from a state agency.

Laws 1978, LB 715, § 8.